test/src/morphology/V-vwttw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - võttõ: # Verb 19 'eng /est võtta/fin' - full paradigm
     võttõ+V+Inf: võttõ
     võttõ+V+Ger: võttõs
     võttõ+V+Ger: võttõs
     võttõ+V+Sup: võtām
     võttõ+V+Sup+Ine: võtāmõs
     võttõ+V+Sup+Ela: võtāmõst
     võttõ+V+Sup+Tra: võtāmõks
     võttõ+V+Sup+Abe: võtāmõt
     võttõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: võtāb
     võttõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: võtāt
     võttõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: võtābõd
     võttõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: võtīz
     võttõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [võtīzt, võtīztõ]
     võttõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [võtīzt, võtīztõ]
     võttõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: võt
     võttõ+V+Cond+Sg3: võtāks
     võttõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: võtā
     võttõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: võttõ
     võttõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: võtāgid
     võttõ+V+Jus+Sg3: võtāg
     võttõ+V+QuoSg3: võtāji
     võttõ+V+ActPrfPrc: võttõn
     võttõ+V+PssPrfPrc: võttõd
